en: Volleyball Nets
xx: Volleyball Nets
cs: Volejbalové sítě
da: Volleyballnet
de: Volleyballnetze
es: Redes para voleibol
fr: Filets de volley-ball
it: Reti da pallavolo
ja: バレーボール用ネット
nl: Volleybalnetten
no: Volleyballnett
pl: Siatki do siatkówki
pt: Redes de vôlei
ru: Волейбольные сетки
sv: Volleybollnät
tr: Voleybol Fileleri

en: Volleyball Protective Gear
xx: Volleyball Protective Gear
cs: Volejbalové chrániče
da: Beskyttelsesudstyr til volleyball
de: Volleyball-Schutzkleidung
es: Equipamiento de protección para voleibol
fr: Protections de volley-ball
it: Protezioni per pallavolo
ja: バレーボール用サポーター
nl: Beschermende uitrusting voor volleybal
no: Beskyttelsesutstyr for volleyball
pl: Sprzęt ochronny do siatkówki
pt: Equipamento de proteção para vôlei
ru: Защитная экипировка для волейбола
sv: Skyddsutrustning för volleyboll
tr: Voleybol Koruyucu Kıyafetleri

en: Volleyball Knee Pads
xx: Volleyball Knee Pads
cs: Volejbalové chrániče kolen
da: Knæpuder til volleyball
de: Volleyball-Knieschoner
es: Rodilleras para voleibol
fr: Genouillères de volley-ball
it: Ginocchiere per pallavolo
ja: バレーボール用膝サポーター
nl: Kniebeschermers voor volleybal
no: Knebeskyttelse for volleyball
pl: Siatkarskie ochraniacze na kolana
pt: Joelheiras para vôlei
ru: Наколенники для волейбола
sv: Knäskydd för volleyboll
tr: Voleybol Dizlikleri

en: Volleyball Training Aids
xx: Volleyball Training Aids
cs: Tréninkové pomůcky na volejbal
da: Træningsudstyr til volleyball
de: Volleyball-Trainingshilfen
es: Material de entrenamiento para voleibol
fr: Matériel d'entraînement de volley-ball
it: Supporti per l'allenamento a pallavolo
ja: バレーボール練習器具
nl: Hulpmiddelen voor volleybaltraining
no: Treningsutstyr for volleyball
pl: Sprzęt do treningu siatkarskiego
pt: Equipamento de treinamento de vôlei
ru: Оборудование для волейбольных тренировок
sv: Träningshjälpmedel för volleyboll
tr: Voleybol Eğitim Araçları

en: Volleyballs
xx: Volleyballs
cs: Volejbalové míče
da: Volleybolde
de: Volleybälle
es: Pelotas de voleibol
fr: Ballons de volley
it: Palle da pallavolo
ja: バレーボール
nl: Volleyballen
no: Volleyballer
pl: Piłki siatkowe
pt: Bolas de vôlei
ru: Волейбольные мячи
sv: Volleybollar
tr: Voleybol Topları

en: Wallyball Equipment
xx: Wallyball Equipment
cs: Vybavení na wallyball
da: Udstyr til wallyball
de: Wallyball-Ausrüstung
es: Equipamiento para wallyball
fr: Équipement de wallyball
it: Attrezzature da wallyball
ja: ウォーリーボール用品
nl: Benodigdheden voor wallybal
no: Utstyr til wallyball
pl: Sprzęt do gry w wallyball
pt: Equipamento de wallyball
ru: Экипировка для валлибола
sv: Wallyball-utrustning
tr: Wallyball Malzemeleri

en: Water Polo
xx: Water Polo
cs: Vodní pólo
da: Vandpolo
de: Wasserball
es: Waterpolo
fr: Water polo
it: Pallanuoto
ja: 水球用品
nl: Waterpolo
no: Vannpolo
pl: Piłka wodna
pt: Polo aquático
ru: Водное поло
sv: Vattenpolo
tr: Su Polosu

en: Water Polo Balls
xx: Water Polo Balls
cs: Míče na vodní pólo
da: Vandpolobolde
de: Wasserbälle
es: Balones de waterpolo
fr: Ballons de water polo
it: Palloni da pallanuoto
ja: 水球ボール
nl: Waterpoloballen
no: Vannpoloballer
pl: Piłki do piłki wodnej
pt: Bolas de polo aquático
ru: Мячи для водного поло
sv: Vattenpolobollar
tr: Su Polosu Topları

en: Water Polo Caps
xx: Water Polo Caps
cs: Čepice na vodní pólo
da: Vandpolohjelme
de: Wasserballkappen
es: Gorros de waterpolo
fr: Bonnets de water polo
it: Cuffie da pallanuoto
ja: 水球用キャップ
nl: Badmutsen voor waterpolo
no: Vannpolohetter
pl: Czepki do piłki wodnej
pt: Toucas de polo aquático
ru: Шапочки для водного поло
sv: Vattenpolomössor
tr: Su Polosu Boneleri

en: Water Polo Goals
xx: Water Polo Goals
cs: Branky na vodní pólo
da: Vandpolomål
de: Wasserballtore
es: Porterías de waterpolo
fr: Buts de water polo
it: Porte da pallanuoto
ja: 水球用ゴール
nl: Waterpolodoelen
no: Vannpolomål
pl: Bramki do piłki wodnej
pt: Goleiras de polo aquático
ru: Ворота для водного поло
sv: Vattenpolomål
tr: Su Polosu Kaleleri

en: Wrestling
xx: Wrestling
cs: Zápas
da: Brydning
de: Ringen
es: Lucha
fr: Lutte
it: Wrestling
ja: レスリング用品
nl: Worstelen
no: Bryting
pl: Zapasy
pt: Luta
ru: Борьба
sv: Brottning
tr: Güreş

en: Wrestling Protective Gear
xx: Wrestling Protective Gear
cs: Zápasnické ochranné pomůcky
da: Beskyttelsesudstyr til brydning
de: Schutzbekleidung für Ringer
es: Equipo de protección para lucha
fr: Protections pour la lutte
it: Attrezzatura protettiva lotta
ja: レスリング用プロテクター
nl: Beschermende uitrusting voor worstelen
no: Beskyttelsesutstyr for bryting
pl: Ochraniacze zapaśnicze
pt: Equipamentos de proteção para luta
ru: Защитная экипировка для борьбы
sv: Skyddsutrustning för brottning
tr: Güreş Koruyucu Giysileri

en: Wrestling Headgear
xx: Wrestling Headgear
cs: Zápasnické chrániče hlavy
da: Hovedbeskyttelse til wrestling
de: Ringer-Kopfschutz
es: Protección para la cabeza para lucha
fr: Casque de protection pour la lutte
it: Caschi da wrestling
ja: レスリング用ヘッドギア
nl: Hoofdbeschermers voor worstelen
no: Hodebeskyttelse for bryting
pl: Kaski zapaśnicze
pt: Capacetes para luta greco-romana
ru: Шлемы для рестлинга
sv: Huvudskydd för brottning
tr: Güreş Başlıkları

en: Wrestling Knee Pads
xx: Wrestling Knee Pads
cs: Zápasnické chrániče kolen
da: Knæbeskyttere til wrestling
de: Ringer-Kniepolster
es: Rodilleras para lucha
fr: Genouillères pour la lutte
it: Ginocchiere per wrestling
ja: レスリング用膝サポーター
nl: Kniebeschermers voor worstelen
no: Knebeskyttere for bryting
pl: Zapaśnicze ochraniacze na kolana
pt: Joelheiras para luta greco-romana
ru: Наколенники для рестлинга
sv: Knäskydd för brottning
tr: Güreş Dizlikleri

en: Exercise & Fitness
xx: Exercise & Fitness
cs: Cvičení a fitness
da: Fitness og konditionstræning
de: Fitness
es: Fitness y musculación
fr: Entraînement et fitness, Appareil de fitness non électrique, Accessoire aquafitness, Elastiband, Équipement de musculation non électrique, Fitness tube
it: Esercizio e fitness
ja: エクササイズ・フィットネス
nl: Sporten en fitness
no: Trening og fysisk form
pl: Fitness
pt: Exercícios e condicionamento físico
ru: Товары для фитнеса
sv: Träning och fitness
tr: Egzersiz ve Fitness

en: Ab Wheels & Rollers
xx: Ab Wheels & Rollers
cs: Kolečka a válečky na posilování břišních svalů
da: Mavetrænere
de: Bauchtrainer
es: Ruedas y rodillos para abdominales
fr: Roues et rollers abdominaux
it: Ruote e rulli per addominali
ja: 腹筋ローラー
nl: Buikspierwielen en -rollers
no: Magehjul
pl: Kółka i wałki do ćwiczeń
pt: Rodas e rolos para abdominais
ru: Гимнастические колеса и ролики
sv: Träningshjul för magmuskelträning
tr: Ab Wheel'lar ve Ab Roller'lar

en: Aerobic Steps
xx: Aerobic Steps
cs: Stupínky na aerobic
da: Stepbænke
de: Steppbretter
es: Steps para aeróbic
fr: Steps d'aérobic
it: Step per aerobica
ja: エクササイズステップ
nl: Aerobic steps
no: Stepkasse
pl: Podesty do aerobiku
pt: Steps aeróbicos
ru: Платформы для аэробики
sv: Aerobics-brädor
tr: Aerobik Step Tahtası

en: Weight cuffs, Cuff weights, Ankle and wrist weights, Ankle weights, Wrist Weights
da: Ankel-/håndledsvægte
de: Gewichtsmanschetten
fi: Nilkka-/rannepaino
sv: Ankel-/handledsvikter

en: Balance Trainers
xx: Balance Trainers
cs: Balanční desky
da: Balancetrænere
de: Balancetrainer
es: Material para entrenar el equilibrio
fr: Plateaux d'équilibre
it: Attrezzi per l'allenamento dell'equilibrio
ja: バランストレーニング用品
nl: Balanstrainers
no: Utstyr til balansetrening
pl: Trening równowagi
pt: Aparelhos para treinamento de equilíbrio
ru: Балансировочные тренажеры
sv: Balansträningsredskap
tr: Denge Eğitim Aletleri

en: Cardio
xx: Cardio
cs: Kardio
da: Cardio
de: Cardio
es: Cardio
fr: Cardio
it: Cardio
ja: 有酸素運動
nl: Cardio
no: Kondisjonstrening
pl: Trening kardio
pt: Cardio
ru: Товары для кардиотренировок
sv: Konditionsträning
tr: Kardiyo